Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
CHAPTER 272A Kentucky Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act
272A.15-040.
Disposition of assets.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a disposition of assets under KRS

272A.15-020

shall be approved by:

At least two-thirds (2/3) of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under KRS

272A.15-030

(2); and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

The organic rules may require that the percentage of votes under subsection (1)(a) of this section is:

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

A combination of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.

Subject to any contractual obligations, after a disposition of assets is approved and at any time before the consummation of the disposition, a limited cooperative association may approve an amendment to the contract for disposition or the resolution authorizing the disposition or approve abandonment of the disposition:

As provided in the contract or the resolution; and

Except as prohibited by the resolution, with the same affirmative vote of the board of directors and of the members as was required to approve the disposition.

The voting requirements for districts, classes, or voting groups under KRS

272A.4-040

apply to approval of a disposition of assets under this subchapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 109, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 16. Mergers and Conversions

272A.16-010.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Constituent entity” means an entity that is a party to a merger;

“Constituent limited cooperative association” means a limited cooperative association that is a party to a merger;

“Converted entity” means the limited cooperative association into which a converting entity converts;

“Converting entity” means a foreign entity that converts into a limited cooperative association pursuant to KRS

272A.16-020

;

“Converting limited cooperative association” means a converting entity that is a limited cooperative association;

“Foreign entity” has the meaning set forth in KRS

14A.1-070

;

“Organizational documents” means articles of incorporation, bylaws, articles of association, operating agreements, partnership agreements, or other documents serving a similar function in the creation and governance of an entity;

“Personal liability” means personal liability for a debt, liability, or other obligation of an entity imposed, by operation of law or otherwise, on a person that co-owns or has an interest in the entity:

By the entity’s organic law solely because of the person co-owning or having an interest in the entity; or

By the entity’s organizational documents under a provision of the entity’s organic law authorizing those documents to make one (1) or more specified persons liable for all or specified parts of the entity’s debts, liabilities, and other obligations solely because the person co-owns or has an interest in the entity; and

“Surviving entity” means an entity into which one (1) or more other entities are merged, whether the entity existed before the merger or is created by the merger.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 110, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-020.
Conversion of foreign entity into limited cooperative association.

A foreign entity may convert to a limited cooperative association as provided in KRS

272A.17-040

(6).

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 111, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-030.
Effect of conversion.

A foreign entity that has been converted into a limited cooperative association is for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion but, after conversion, it is organized under this chapter and is subject to that law and other law as it applies thereto.

When a conversion takes effect:

All property owned by the converting entity remains vested in the converted entity;

All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the converting entity continue as obligations of the converted entity;

An action or proceeding pending by or against the converting entity may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred;

Except as prohibited by other law, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the converting entity remain vested in the converted entity;

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the terms and conditions of the plan of conversion take effect; and

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the conversion does not dissolve the converting entity.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 112, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-040.
Merger.

One (1) or more limited cooperative associations may merge with one (1) or more other limited cooperative associations, and one (1) or more business corporations or limited liability companies may merge with and into a limited cooperative association pursuant to this subchapter and a plan of merger if:

The governing statute of each of the other entities authorizes the merger;

The merger is not prohibited by the law of a jurisdiction that enacted any of those governing statutes; and

Each of the other entities complies with its governing statute in effecting the merger.

A plan of merger shall be in a record and shall include:

The name and form of each constituent entity;

The name of the surviving entity, which shall be a limited cooperative association, and, if the surviving entity is to be created by the merger, a statement to that effect;

The terms and conditions of the merger, including the manner and basis for converting the interests in each constituent entity into any combination of money, interests in the surviving entity, and other consideration;

If the surviving entity is to be created by the merger, the surviving entity’s organic rules;

If the surviving entity is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to be made by the merger to the surviving entity’s organic rules; and

If a member of a constituent limited cooperative association will have personal liability with respect to a surviving entity, the identity of the member by descriptive class or other reasonable manner.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 113, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-050.
Notice of and action on plan of merger.

For a limited cooperative association to merge with another entity, a plan of merger shall be approved by a majority vote of the board of directors or a greater percentage if required by the association’s organic rules.

The board of directors shall call a members meeting to consider a plan of merger approved by the board, hold the meeting not later than ninety (90) days after approval of the plan by the board, and mail or otherwise transmit or deliver in a record to each member:

The plan of merger, or a summary of the plan, and a statement of the manner in which a copy of the plan in a record may be reasonably obtained by a member;

A recommendation that the members approve the plan of merger, or if the board determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for that determination;

A statement of any condition of the board’s submission of the plan of merger to the members; and

Notice of the meeting at which the plan of merger will be considered, which shall be given in the same manner as notice of a special meeting of members.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 114, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-060.
Approval of merger — Abandonment.

Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a plan of merger shall be approved by:

At least two-thirds (2/3) of the voting power of members present at a members meeting called under KRS

272A.16-050

; and

If the limited cooperative association has investor members, at least a majority of the votes cast by patron members, unless the organic rules require a greater percentage vote by patron members.

The organic rules may provide that the percentage of votes under subsection (1)(a) of this section is:

A different percentage that is not less than a majority of members voting at the meeting;

Measured against the voting power of all members; or

A combination of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.

The vote required to approve a plan of merger shall not be less than the vote required for the members of the limited cooperative association to amend the articles of association.

Consent in a record to a plan of merger by a member shall be delivered to the limited cooperative association before delivery of articles of merger for filing pursuant to KRS

272A.16-070

if, as a result of the merger, the member will have:

Personal liability for an obligation of the association; or

An obligation or liability for an additional contribution.

Subject to subsection (4) of this section and any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any time before the effective date of the merger, a limited cooperative association that is a party to the merger may approve an amendment to the plan of merger or approve abandonment of the planned merger:

As provided in the plan; and

Except as prohibited by the plan, with the same affirmative vote of the board of directors and of the members as was required to approve the plan.

The voting requirements for districts, classes, or voting groups under KRS

272A.4-040

apply to approval of a merger.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 115, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-070.
Articles of merger — Effective date.

After each constituent entity has approved a merger, articles of merger shall be signed on behalf of each constituent entity by an authorized representative.

The articles of merger shall include:

The name and form of each constituent entity and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

The name and form of the surviving entity, the jurisdiction of its governing statute, and, if the surviving entity is created by the merger, a statement to that effect;

The date the merger is effective under the governing statute of the surviving entity;

If the surviving entity is to be created by the merger, the limited cooperative association’s articles of association;

If the surviving entity is not created by the merger, any amendments provided for in the plan of merger to its articles of association;

A statement as to each constituent entity that the merger was approved as required by the entity’s governing statute; and

Any additional information required by the governing statute of any constituent entity.

The limited cooperative association that is the surviving entity to a merger shall deliver the articles of merger to the Secretary of State for filing.

A merger becomes effective upon the articles of merger being effective as provided in KRS

14A.2-070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 116, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-080.
Effect of merger.

When a merger becomes effective:

The surviving entity continues or comes into existence;

Each constituent entity that merges into the surviving entity ceases to exist as a separate entity;

All property owned by each constituent entity that ceases to exist vests in the surviving entity;

All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of each constituent entity that ceases to exist continue as obligations of the surviving entity;

An action or proceeding pending by or against any constituent entity that ceases to exist may be continued as if the merger had not occurred;

Except as prohibited by law other than this chapter, all rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of each constituent entity that ceases to exist vest in the surviving entity;

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of merger, the terms and conditions of the plan take effect;

Except as otherwise provided in the plan of merger, if a merging limited cooperative association ceases to exist, the merger does not dissolve the association for purposes of Subchapter 12 of this chapter;

If the surviving entity is created by the merger, the articles of association become effective; and

If the surviving entity is not created by the merger, any amendments made by the articles of merger for the organic rules of the surviving entity become effective.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 117, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-090.
Treatment of merger as a consolidation.

Constituent entities that are limited cooperative associations or foreign cooperatives may agree to call a merger a consolidation.

All provisions governing mergers or using the term merger in this chapter apply equally to mergers that the constituent entities choose to call consolidations under subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 118, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.16-100.
Article not exclusive.

This subchapter shall not prohibit a limited cooperative association from being converted or merged pursuant to other law of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 119, effective July 12, 2012.

SUBCHAPTER 17. Miscellaneous Provisions

272A.17-010.
Uniformity of interpretation.

In applying and construing the Kentucky Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 120, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.17-020.
Electronic signature.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes, the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 7001

et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7001(c)

, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7003(b)

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 121, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.17-030.
Savings clause.

This chapter shall not affect an action or proceeding commenced, or right accrued, before July 12, 2012.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 122, effective July 12, 2012.

272A.17-040.
Transition.

This chapter does not limit, prohibit, or invalidate the existence, acts, or obligations of any cooperative or association created or doing business in this Commonwealth before, on, or after July 12, 2012.

A cooperative or association formed under KRS Chapter 272, until or unless it becomes a limited cooperative association under this chapter, shall be governed by KRS Chapter 272.

The enactment of this chapter shall not impair, or otherwise affect, the organization or the continued existence of a cooperative association existing on July 12, 2012.

This chapter governs only:

A limited cooperative association formed on or after July 12, 2012; and

A cooperative or association with shares which elects, in the manner provided in its articles of incorporation or by law for amending the articles of incorporation, to be subject to this chapter.

A cooperative or association with shares formed under KRS Chapter 272 may elect to become subject to this chapter by a consent sufficient to amend the articles of incorporation. Thereafter the cooperative or association with shares shall file amended and restated articles of association which comply with KRS

272A.3-010

and that further set forth:

The name of the cooperative or association with shares as set forth in its articles of incorporation;

The date of filing of its articles of incorporation;

An affirmative election by the cooperative or association with shares to be subject to this chapter; and

An affirmative statement that the election was approved as required by this subsection.

A cooperative, association, limited liability company or corporation formed in a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth of Kentucky may elect to be subject to this chapter by a consent sufficient to amend its articles of incorporation, articles of association, or equivalent filing under the laws of its jurisdiction of formation. Thereafter, the foreign entity shall file amended and restated articles of association which comply with KRS

272A.3-010

and further set forth:

The name of the foreign entity;

The previous jurisdiction of organization;

An affirmative election by the foreign entity to be subject to this chapter; and

A statement that the election to be governed by this chapter is effective under the law and agreements governing the foreign entity prior to becoming subject to this chapter.

An election pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this section is effective upon the effective time and date of the amended and restated articles of association as provided in KRS

14A.2-070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 160, § 123, effective July 12, 2012.